Washington statutes.
RCW 9.96.030

Certified copy—Recording and indexing.

Upon the filing of an instrument restoring civil rights in his or her office, it shall be the duty of the secretary of state to transmit a duly certified copy thereof to the clerk of the superior court named therein, who shall record the same in the journal of the court and index the same in the execution docket of the cause in which the conviction was had.

[ 2011 c 336 s 344; 1931 c 19 s 3; 1929 c 26 s 4; RRS s 10252.]